Wyoming, session 2026, HB0073.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-101(a)(vi) and (xvii)(C) and
39-13-103(b)(iii)(intro), (C) and by creating a new
paragraph (xviii) are amended to read:

39-11-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act unless otherwise specifically
provided:
HB0073

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0101

(vi) "Fair market value" means the amount in
cash, or terms reasonably equivalent to cash, a well
informed buyer is justified in paying for a property and a
well informed seller is justified in accepting, assuming
neither party to the transaction is acting under undue
compulsion, and assuming the property has been offered in
the open market for a reasonable time, except, fair market
value of agricultural land shall be determined as provided
by W.S. 39-13-103(b)(x), fair market value of residential
real property shall be determined as provided in W.S.
39-13-103(b)(xviii) and fair market value of mine products
shall be determined as provided by W.S. 39-14-103(b),
39-14-203(b), 39-14-303(b), 39-14-403(b), 39-14-503(b),
39-14-603(b) and 39-14-703(b);

(xvii) "Taxable value" means a percent of the
fair market value of property in a particular class as
follows:

(C) All other property, real and personal,
including property valued and assessed under W.S.
39-13-102(m)(vi) and (ix), nine and one-half percent
HB0073

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0101
(9.5%), provided that the value of residential real
property shall be determined as provided in W.S.
39-13-103(b)(xviii).

39-13-103. Imposition.

(b) Basis of tax. The following shall apply:

(iii) Beginning January 1, 1989, "Taxable value"
means a percent of the fair market value of property in a
particular class as follows:

(C) All other property, real and personal,
nine and one-half percent (9.5%), provided that the value
of residential real property shall be determined as
provided in paragraph (xviii) of this subsection.

(xviii) The following shall apply to the
valuation of residential real property, as made subject to
taxation in subparagraph (iii)(C) of this subsection:

HB0073

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0101
(A) Beginning January 1, 2028, the fair
market value of residential real property shall be
determined as follows:

(I) For any residential real property
that was last acquired on or before December 31, 2019, the
base year value for the residential real property shall be
equal to the fair market value of the property on January
1, 2019;

(II) For any residential real property
that was last acquired between January 1, 2020 and December
31, 2027, the base year value for the residential real
property shall be equal to the fair market value of the
property on January 1 of the year the property was last
acquired;

(III) For any residential real
property that is acquired on or after January 1, 2028,
there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the price paid
to acquire the property is the fair market value of the
property. The fair market value determined under this
subdivision shall be used as the base year value for the
HB0073

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0101
property, except as provided in subdivision (IV) of this
subparagraph;

(IV) Notwithstanding subdivision (III)
of this subparagraph, for any residential real property
that is acquired on or after January 1, 2028, the fair
market value of the property on January 1 of the year the
property was acquired shall be used as the base year value
of the property if:

(1) The presumption under
subdivision (III) of this subparagraph is rebutted by a
preponderance of the evidence showing that the price paid
to acquire the property was not at fair market value
because a party to the transaction was acting under undue
influence or the terms of the transaction were not
negotiated at arms-length between an informed buyer and
seller; or

(2) The owner of the residential
real property does not submit information that is
sufficient to enable the assessor to establish the price
HB0073

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0101
paid to acquire the property under subdivision (III) of
this subparagraph.

(B) The base year value determined under
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall be annually
adjusted to determine the fair market value of the property
for that tax year as follows:

(I) The base year value shall be
adjusted each year beginning in the first year after the
base year value is determined under subparagraph (A) of
this paragraph as provided in this subdivision. The
department of revenue in coordination with the economic
analysis division of the department of administration and
information shall create an index that reviews residential
real property values across the state in comparison to the
prior year to determine if residential property values are
increasing or decreasing. If residential real property
values are decreasing under the index, the value of the
property from the prior year shall be reduced at the same
rate determined by the index. If residential real property
values are increasing under the index, the value of the
property shall be adjusted by an inflation factor that is
HB0073

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0101
the lesser of two percent (2%) or the rate of the consumer
price index or its successor index of the United States
department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the
applicable year;

(II) The base year value shall be
adjusted as necessary to account for increases in the value
of the residential real property caused by new construction
or significant additions to the property. The value of the
new construction or significant additions shall be added to
the base year value of the residential real property. The
value of the new construction or significant additions
shall be determined by the construction costs. Actual costs
may be submitted to determine construction costs. If actual
costs are not submitted or if the construction costs do not
represent fair market value because a party to the
transaction was acting under undue influence or the terms
of the transaction were not negotiated at arms-length, the
construction costs shall be determined based on average
construction costs in the state for the applicable tax year
for a comparable construction or addition.

HB0073

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0101
(C) The amount determined pursuant to
subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph shall be the
fair market value of the residential real property until
ownership of the property is transferred to a new person.
Each time residential real property is transferred to a new
person, the property shall be valued as provided in
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph to determine the new
base year value of the property. The new base year value of
the property shall be subject to adjustment as provided in
subparagraph (B) of this paragraph;

(D) The department shall adopt rules
necessary to implement this paragraph. The rules shall
include:

(I) Rules regarding the documentation
and procedures required to establish the price paid to
acquire the property under this paragraph;

(II) Rules specifying how construction
costs are determined and reported;

HB0073

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0101
(III) Rules specifying how significant
additions to residential real property are determined and
reported.

(E) As used in this paragraph:

(I) "Price paid to acquire the
property" means the actual full amount paid or to be paid
to acquire residential real property;

(II) "Residential real property" means
real property improved by a dwelling designed to house not
more than three (3) families and includes associated
residential land where the dwelling is located if the land
is owned by the owner of the dwelling. The dwelling may
include any type of residence including a single family
home or an individual condominium unit if the dwelling is
used as a primary residence;

(III) "Significant addition" means any
construction of residential real property that adds
habitable square feet to the residential real property and
includes construction where all or a portion of the
HB0073

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0101
dwelling is demolished and reconstructed. "Significant
addition" shall not include finishing an unfinished portion
of the existing dwelling;

(IV) "Transfer" or "acquisition" of
residential real property does not include:

(1) A transfer of property
between spouses or between a parent and the parent's child.
Transfers to heirs by will or intestate succession shall
not constitute a transfer under this subdivision, however
subsequent sales or transfers of residential real property
that are not otherwise excluded as a transfer under this
subdivision shall be a transfer of residential real
property;

(2) A transfer of property
pursuant to a court order including to effectuate a
settlement agreement or in compliance with a decree of
divorce or judicial separation;

HB0073

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0101
(3) A transfer of property to a
trust established for the benefit of the immediately
preceding owner;

(4) A transfer of property to a
corporation, partnership or limited liability company if
the immediately preceding owner of the property is a
shareholder or owner of the corporation, partnership or
limited liability company, provided that a change in more
than fifty percent (50%) of the ownership interest of an
entity holding residential real property under this
subdivision within one (1) year shall constitute a transfer
of residential real property;

(5) A donation of residential
real property to a religious or charitable organization,
including a nonprofit organization;

(6) Any other transfer of
property that the department determines by rule should not
be an acquisition of property due to the relationship of
the parties or other factors.

HB0073

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0101
Section 2. The state board of equalization and the
department of revenue shall promulgate all rules necessary
to implement this act not later than January 1, 2028.

Section 3. This act shall be effective only upon
certification by the secretary of state that the electors
have adopted the amendment to the Wyoming constitution at
the 2026 general election provided in 2026 House Joint
Resolution 0004.

Section 4.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(b) Subject to section 3 of this act, section 1 of
this act is effective January 1, 2028.

(END)
HB0073